Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-321] Standards-based curriculum. (a)
When developing a standards-based curriculum and implementing it in a school or
complex, at the minimum, the curriculum shall:

(1) Be specific in its standards-based scope and
sequence over a school year for each grade level and course;

(2) Be consistent in course content;

(3) Be aligned across all grade levels;

(4) Specifically address the state content and
performance standards and related benchmark maps; and

(5) Be implemented in all appropriate classrooms in
the school or complex.

(b) School complexes may choose to develop an
articulated and aligned K-12 standards-based curriculum in one or more of the
following core content areas:

(1) Language arts;

(2) Mathematics;

(3) Science; and

(4) Social studies.

(c) School complexes shall provide
professional development.

(d) School complexes that develop a
standards-based curriculum shall use standards-based formative assessment tools
to monitor student progress, not less than on a quarterly basis throughout the
school year.

(e) School complexes shall develop rigorous
classroom-based performance assessments.

(f) School complexes may implement software
programs at the school level to help to align school course material with Hawaii content and performance and federal educational standards. [L 2006, c 301, §2]

Note

Annual progress reports to legislature through 2009 session.
L 2006, c 301, §3.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next